Utah statutes.
76-8-502.   False or inconsistent material statements.

A person is guilty of a felony of the second degree if in any official proceeding:

(1)  He makes a false material statement under oath or affirmation or swears or affirms the truth of a material statement previously made and he does not believe the statement to be true; or

(2)  He makes inconsistent material statements under oath or affirmation, both within the period of limitations, one of which is false and not believed by him to be true.

